Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 5. Prescription Drug Cost Containment
§ 2004a.
Evidence-Based Education and Advertising Fund.

The Evidence-Based Education and Advertising Fund is established in the State Treasury as a special fund to be a source of financing for activities relating to fund collection and analysis of information on pharmaceutical marketing activities under

18 V.S.A. §§ 4632

and 4633; for analysis of prescription drug data needed by the Office of the Attorney General for enforcement activities; for the Vermont Prescription Monitoring System established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 84A; for the evidence-based education program established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 91, subchapter 2; for statewide unused prescription drug disposal initiatives; for the prevention of prescription drug misuse, abuse, and diversion; for the Substance Misuse Prevention Oversight and Advisory Council established in

18 V.S.A. § 4803

; for treatment of substance use disorder; for exploration of nonpharmacological approaches to pain management; for a hospital antimicrobial program for the purpose of reducing hospital-acquired infections; for the purchase and distribution of fentanyl testing strips; for the purchase and distribution of naloxone to emergency medical services personnel; and for the support of any opioid-antagonist education, training, and distribution program operated by the Department of Health or its agents. Monies deposited into the Fund shall be used for the purposes described in this section.

Into the Fund shall be deposited:

revenue from the manufacturer fee established under section 2004 of this title; and

the proceeds from grants, donations, contributions, taxes, and any other sources of revenue as may be provided by statute, rule, or act of the General Assembly.

The Fund shall be administered pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, except that interest earned on the Fund and any remaining balance shall be retained in the Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 80

, § 20a; amended

2011, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § E.311.1, eff. May 17, 2012;

2013, No. 50

, § E.312.2;

2013, No. 95

(Adj. Sess.), § 85, eff. Feb. 25, 2014;

2015, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2019, No. 72

, § E.313.1.

§§ 2005,
2006.
Recodified. 2007, No. 80, § 23. [Repealed]

§ 2007.
Canadian Prescription Drug Information Program.

The Department of Vermont Health Access shall establish a website and prepare written information to offer guidance to Vermont residents seeking information about ordering prescription drugs through the mail or otherwise from a participating Canadian pharmacy.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 128m; amended

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 106;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.68.

§ 2008.
Recodified. 2007, No. 80, § 23.

§ 2009.
Repealed. 2007, No. 80, § 24.

§ 2010.
Repealed. 2017, No. 210 (Adj. Sess.). § 15, effective June 1, 2018.